Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-712
Electric line paralleling or intersecting certain telephone lines; inductive interference; effect.

Notwithstanding any provisions of sections 75-709 to 75-711, whenever electric lines which parallel or intersect one-wire ground return telephone lines are constructed, maintained and operated in accordance with recognized standard engineering specifications, the owner of the electric lines shall not be liable for any inductive electrical interference which the use and operation of the electric lines may cause to the one-wire ground return telephone lines, and no application for authority to construct, operate and maintain such electric lines shall be denied because such lines will create inductive interference in any existing one-wire ground return telephone lines.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. VII, § 12, p. 1424.